District of Columbia statutes.
46-224.01

Interception of lottery prizes for delinquent child support payments.

(a)

In the case of orders being enforced by the IV-D agency, the Mayor may intercept a lottery prize winning, including a lump sum or periodic payment that is derived from a previously claimed prize, of an individual who owes delinquent support, as defined in section 466(e) of the Social Security Act, approved August 16, 1984 (98 Stat. 1310; 42 U.S.C. § 666(e)).

(b)

Prior to interception of an individual’s lottery prize winnings, the Mayor shall provide notice to the lottery prize winner of the pending interception of the lottery prize winnings and of the opportunity to contest the interception of the lottery prize winnings.

Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-166, § 25a
as added July 25, 1990, D.C. Law 8-150, § 4(e), 37 DCR 3720
Feb. 5, 1994, D.C. Law 10-68, § 28(a), 40 DCR 6311
Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-269, § 108(v), 48 DCR 1270

History

This section is referenced in § 46-226.03.

Section References

1981 Ed., § 30-524.1.

Prior Codifications

D.C. Law 13-269 rewrote subsec. (a) which had read:
“(a) In the case of orders being enforced by the IV-D agency, the Mayor may intercept a lottery prize winning of an individual who owes delinquent support, as defined in § 466(e) of the Social Security Act, approved August 16, 1984 (98 Stat. 1310; 42 U.S.C. 666(e)).”

Effect of Amendments

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 7(u) of Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-210, April 13, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 3832).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 107(v) of Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Temporary Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Law 13-57, March 7, 2000, law notification 47 DCR 1979).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 107(v) of Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Temporary Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Law 13-207, March 31, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 3238).

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary amendment of section, see § 7(u) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Second Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-309, March 20, 1998, 45 DCR 1923), § 7(u) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Second Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-439, August 12, 1998, 45 DCR 6110), § 7(u) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-503, October 27, 1998, 45 DCR 8495), and § 7(u) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-600, January 20, 1999, 46 DCR 1239).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 107(v) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-126, August 4, 1999, 46 DCR 6606).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 107(v) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-177, November 2, 1999, 46 DCR 9678).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 107(v) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-241, January 11, 2000, 47 DCR 581).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 107(v) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-446, November 7, 2000, 47 DCR 9213).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 108(v) of Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-5, February 13, 2001, 48 DCR 2440).

Emergency Legislation